da: Kompatibilitet med shuffleboardbordlængde: 12 fod; 14 fod; 16 fod; 18 fod; 20 fod; 22 fod; 9 fod; Andet
pt-BR: Mesa de shuffleboard compatibilidade de comprimento: 12 pés; 14 pés; 16 pés; 18 pés; 20 pés; 22 pés; 9 pés; Outro
en: Shuffleboard table length compatibility: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Other
cs: Kompatibilita délek stolu pro shuffleboard: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Jiná
zh-CN: 沙狐球桌长度兼容性: 12 英尺; 14 英尺; 16 英尺; 18 英尺; 20 英尺; 22 英尺; 9 英尺; 其他
sv: Kompatibilitet med shuffleboardbordets längd: 12 fot; 14 fot; 16 fot; 18 fot; 20 fot; 22 fot; 9 fot; Övrigt
de: Kompatibilität mit Shuffleboard-Tischlängen: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Andere
vi: Khả năng tương thích chiều dài bàn chơi shuffleboard: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Khác
nl: Shuffleboard tafel lengtecompatibiliteit: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Overig
nb: Kompatibilitet med shuffleboard-bordets lengde: 12 fot; 14 fot; 16 fot; 18 fot; 20 fot; 22 fot; 9 fot; Annet
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com o comprimento da mesa de shuffleboard: 12 pés; 14 pés; 16 pés; 18 pés; 20 pés; 22 pés; 9 pés; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinamumas su šaflbordo stalo ilgiu: 12 pėd.; 14 pėd.; 16 pėd.; 18 pėd.; 20 pėd.; 22 pėd.; 9 pėd.; Kita
ru: Совместимость с длиной стола для шаффлборда: 12 футов; 14 футов; 16 футов; 18 футов; 20 футов; 22 фута; 9 футов; Другое
th: ความเข้ากันได้ของความยาวโต๊ะชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด: 12 ฟุต; 14 ฟุต; 16 ฟุต; 18 ฟุต; 20 ฟุต; 22 ฟุต; 9 ฟุต; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljivost dolžin mize za shuffleboard: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Drugo
fr: Compatibilité avec la longueur de la table de shuffleboard: 12 pi; 14 pi; 16 pi; 18 pi; 20 pi; 22 pi; 9 pi; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost duljine stola za shuffleboard: 12 stopa; 14 stopa; 16 stopa; 18 stopa; 20 stopa; 22 stopa; 9 stopa; Drugo
ko: 셔플보드 테이블 길이 호환성: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; 기타
ja: シャッフルボードテーブル長適合性: 12フィート; 14フィート; 16フィート; 18フィート; 20フィート; 22フィート; 9フィート; その他
hu: Shuffleboard asztalhossz-kompatibilitás: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Egyéb
es: Compatibilidad de longitud de la mesa de tejo: 12 pies; 14 pies; 16 pies; 18 pies; 20 pies; 22 pies; 9 pies; Otro
bg-BG: Съвместимост по дължина на масата за шафълборд: 12 фута; 14 фута; 16 фута; 18 фута; 20 фута; 22 фута; 9 фута; Друго
el: Συμβατότητα μήκους τραπεζιού shuffleboard: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kompatibilita dĺžky stola shuffleboardu: 12 stôp; 14 stôp; 16 stôp; 18 stôp; 20 stôp; 22 stôp; 9 stôp; Iné
fi: Shuffleboard-pöydän pituuden yhteensopivuus: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Muu
tr: Shuffleboard masası uzunluğu uyumluluğu: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Diğer
it: Compatibilità della lunghezza del tavolo da shuffleboard: 12 piedi; 14 piedi; 16 piedi; 18 piedi; 20 piedi; 22 piedi; 9 piedi; Altro
zh-TW: 沙狐球桌長度相容性: 12 英尺; 14 英尺; 16 英尺; 18 英尺; 20 英尺; 22 英尺; 9 英尺; 其他
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu lungimea mesei de shuffleboard: 12 ft; 14 ft; 16 ft; 18 ft; 20 ft; 22 ft; 9 ft; Altele
pl: Zgodność długości stołu do gry w shuffleboard: 12 stóp; 14 stóp; 16 stóp; 18 stóp; 20 stóp; 22 stóp; 9 stóp; Inne